Idaho, session 2025, H0090.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 56-269, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-269. CHANGES IN FINANCIAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA TO BE PROVIDED IN
STATUTE. Effective July 1, 2023 2025, any change in financial that would
expand eligibility criteria for a public assistance program, or that would
expand the benefit provided by a public assistance program, must be pro-
vided in statute and may not be provided in rule, state plan, state plan
amendment, agency guidance, or other documents. For the purpose of this sec-
tion, "agency guidance" shall have the same meaning as described in section
67-5250, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.